Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Division 1. Wyoming Retirement Act
§ 9-3-415.
When retirement permitted; service credit.

Except as provided under W.S.

9-3-431

and

9-3-432

, normal retirement benefits under the system are payable to a member who:

Has at least four (4) years of service credit and is at least sixty (60) years of age and is not subject to paragraph (ii) of this subsection; or

If a general member initially employed after August 31, 2012, has at least four (4) years of service credit and is at least sixty-five (65) years of age; or

Has a combined total of years of service credit and years of age which equals at least eighty-five (85).

Except as provided under W.S.

9-3-432

or subsection (k) of this section, early retirement benefits are payable to a member who has at least four (4) years of service and is at least fifty (50) but not yet sixty (60) years of age or has at least twenty-five (25) years of service and is not yet fifty (50) years of age. The early retirement benefit amount is equal to the normal retirement benefit amount otherwise payable reduced on an actuarial equivalent basis under rules established by the board.

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 38, § 2.

Any vested member may elect to make a one-time purchase of up to five (5) years of service credit as authorized and limited by section 415(c) and 415(n) of the Internal Revenue Code and established in rules promulgated by the board. Any member electing to purchase service credit shall pay into the account a single lump-sum amount equal to the actuarial equivalent of the benefits to be derived from the service credit, the individual’s attained age and the benefit structure of the appropriate plan. A member may purchase service credit with personal funds or, subject to rules and regulations established by the board, through rollover contributions. Unless received by the system in the form of a direct rollover, the rollover contribution shall be paid to the system on or before sixty (60) days after the date it was received by the member. Service credit purchased under this subsection shall qualify as service credit defined in W.S. 9-3-402(a)(xxi), 9-3-602(a)(iii), 9-3-702(a)(iii) and 15-5-402(a)(iv) but shall not be used to determine whether a member is a general member initially employed after August 31, 2012.

Any person who is participating in a lawfully established retirement plan of any Wyoming community college or the University of Wyoming as authorized by W.S.

21-19-102

and elects coverage under this article shall have his Wyoming service under both the community college or University of Wyoming retirement plan and under this article counted to meet the eligibility requirements for retirement as specified in this section.

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 82, § 3.

Subject to subsection (h) of this section and in accordance with rule and regulation of the board protecting the actuarial integrity of the system and its status as a federally qualified plan, any retired member rehired after a break in service of not less than thirty (30) days by a participating employer to fill a vacant full-time position of a regular contributing employee in any capacity including, but not limited to, as a contract employee or as an employee of a third party contractor under an agreement with a participating employer, shall notify the board in writing of his election to:

Discontinue retirement benefits and be reinstated as a contributing member; or

Continue receiving retirement benefits and not be reinstated as a contributing member.

If a retired member is rehired by a participating employer to fill a vacant full-time position of a regular contributing employee in any capacity including, but not limited to, as a contract employee or as an employee of a third party contractor under an agreement with a participating employer, and the retiree is rehired following a break in service of not less than thirty (30) days, the employer shall pay into the account an amount equal to both the members’ and employer’s contributions required by law under the Wyoming retirement system based upon the retiree’s salary. Service by the retiree under this subsection shall not increase retirement benefits under the Wyoming retirement system.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 78, § 2.

If any retired member or employer violates subsection (h) of this section, the board shall immediately cancel the retiree’s retirement benefit and shall reinstate that member as a contributing member.

For a general member initially employed after August 31, 2012, early retirement benefits are payable to a general member who has at least four (4) years of service and is at least fifty-five (55) but not yet sixty-five (65) years of age or has at least twenty-five (25) years of service and is not yet fifty-five (55) years of age. The early retirement benefit amount is equal to the normal retirement benefit amount otherwise payable reduced on an actuarial equivalent basis under rules established by the board.

Any vested member who was honorably discharged from the military service of the United States may elect to purchase service credit in the retirement system, subject to the following:

Purchase of service credit shall be as authorized and limited by section 415(c) and 415(n) of the Internal Revenue Code and rules promulgated by the board;

One (1) year of service credit may be purchased for each year of military service, up to a maximum of eight (8) years;

Cumulative purchases of service credit under this section and as otherwise authorized under the Wyoming Retirement Act shall not exceed eight (8) years;

An employee electing to purchase service credit shall pay into the account a single lump-sum amount equal to the actuarial equivalent of the benefits to be derived from the service credit computed on the basis of actuarial assumptions approved by the board and the individual’s attained age;

The lump sum may be paid with funds from any source, including rollover contributions, subject to rules and regulations established by the board. Unless received by the retirement system in the form of a direct rollover, the rollover contribution shall be paid to the program not more than sixty (60) days after the date it was received by the member;

Service credit purchased under this subsection shall not be used to determine vested eligibility to receive benefits under this article;

Service credit purchased under this subsection shall qualify as service credit defined in W.S. 9-3-402(a)(xxi), 9-3-602(a)(iii), 9-3-702(a)(iii) and 15-5-402(a)(iv) but shall not be used to determine whether a member is a general member initially employed after August 31, 2012.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 9-308; Laws 1967, ch. 68, § 1; 1971, ch. 263, § 3; W.S. 1977, §

9-3-414

, 9-5-214; Laws 1981, ch. 33, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1983, ch. 144, § 1; 1985, ch. 30, § 1; 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 1989, ch. 167, § 1; 1992, ch. 54, § 1; 1993, ch. 149, § 1; 1994, ch. 67, § 2; 1997, ch. 60, § 1; 2001, ch. 38, §§ 1, 2; ch. 46, § 1; ch. 65, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 82, §§ 2, 3; 2005, ch. 113, § 1; ch. 230, § 1; 2006, ch. 60, § 1; 2007, ch. 41, § 1; ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 111, § 1; 2010, ch. 58, § 1; 2012, ch. 108, § 1; 2015 ch. 10, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2015 ch. 92, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 113, § 1, in (g), inserted “in any capacity including, but not limited to, as a contract employee or as an employee of a third party contractor under an agreement with a participating employer”; and in (h), substituted the same for “on a permanent, full-time basis.”

Laws 2005, ch. 113, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 230, § 1, in (a), deleted “subsection (f) of this section” before “W.S.

9-3-431

. ”

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 13, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2005.

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating amendments made by both 2005 acts.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, rewrote (d), clarifying that members must be vested, and that the election is for is for a one-time purchase and establishing eligibility requirements and qualifications for service credit.

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 41, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, in (d), deleted “for any prior service eligible under the federal insurance contribution act or in the case of law enforcement or paid firemen any eligible service” in the first sentence, and substituted “the benefit structure of the appropriate plan” for “average salary for the highest three (3) continuous years of covered service” in the second sentence.

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 78, §§ 1,2, effective July 1, 2007, inserted “after a break in service of not less than thirty (30) days” in the introductory language in (g); rewrote (h), deleting the exception language which read: “Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,” clarified the limitations for rehiring retirees, repealing (h)(i) which read: “Has at least four (4) years of service credit and is at least sixty (60) years of age; or” and repealing (h)(ii), which read: “Has a combined total of years of service credit and years of age which equals at least eighty-five (85).”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out.

The 2008 amendment

added “to fill a vacant full-time position of a regular contributing employee” in the introductory language of (e), and in the first sentence of (h).

Laws 2008, ch. 111, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (d), inserted “authorized and limited by section 415(c) and 415(n) of the Internal Revenue Code and,” and the present second and third sentences.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (a), added “and is not subject to paragraph (ii) of this subsection” in (a)(i), added (a)(ii), and redesignated former (b)(ii) as (b)(iii); added “or subsection (k) of this section” in (b); added “but shall not be used to determine whether a member is a general member initially employed after August 31, 2012” in (d); and added (k).

The 2015 amendments. —

The first 2015 amendment, by ch. 10 § 1, effective July 1, 2015, in (d) in the second sentence, deleted “computed on the basis of actuarial assumptions approved by the board and” preceding “the individual’s” and made a related change.

The second 2015 amendment, by ch. 92, § 1, effective July 1, 2015, added (m).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2006, ch. 60 § 2 states: “(a) Notwithstanding section 1 of this act, all purchases made under W.S. 9-3-415(d) prior to the effective date of this act shall provide the benefit available at the time of purchase. Any purchase made prior to the effective date of this act may be credited toward a purchase under this act subject to rules enacted by the board and the payment of all funds equal to the actuarial equivalent of the increased benefits provided under this act.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Actions under federal Age Discrimination in Employment Act. —

This section, on its face, created an age-based distinction in terms of employment for purposes of the federal Age Discrimination in Employment Act. Accordingly, because direct evidence of discriminatory motive existed, the state's mere articulation of a legitimate reason for an employee's forced retirement was not enough, and it had to establish by a preponderance of the evidence that the employee would have been terminated even absent this section's mandatory retirement provisions. EEOC v. Wyoming Retirement Sys., 771 F.2d 1425, 1985 U.S. App. LEXIS 22845 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1985).

Where a 65-year old government employee did not seek an extension under subsection (b) and was, accordingly, “retired,” he was “involuntarily retired and injured” for purposes of the federal EEOC v. Wyoming Retirement Sys., 771 F.2d 1425, 1985 U.S. App. LEXIS 22845 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1985).

In an action under the federal Age Discrimination in Employment Act (ADEA), the defendants — the state, the Wyoming retirement system and the governor — relied in good faith upon the attorney general's advice that subsection (b) met the requirements of the ADEA. They did not, therefore, commit a willful violation and were not liable for liquidated damages. EEOC v. Wyoming Retirement Sys., 771 F.2d 1425, 1985 U.S. App. LEXIS 22845 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Mandatory retirement of public officer or employee based on age, 81 ALR3d 811.

Employer's liability, under state law, for fraud or misrepresentation inducing employee to take early retirement, 14 ALR5th 537.

“Bona fide employee benefit plan” exception to general prohibition of age discrimination in employment (29 USC § 623(f)(2)), 70 ALR Fed 110.

Who is “employer” within meaning of Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967 (29 USC § 621 et seq.), 137 ALR Fed 551.

§ 9-3-416.
Members leaving service without withdrawing accumulated contributions eligible for retirement.

Except for law enforcement officers, any member who has left service without withdrawing his accumulated contributions and who has a minimum of four (4) years of service is eligible to receive a retirement benefit computed according to the terms of this article, at the age specified in W.S. 9-3-415(a), (b) or (k). Law enforcement officers leaving service without withdrawing accumulated contributions and who have a minimum of four (4) years of service may receive a retirement benefit amount in accordance with W.S.

9-3-432

. Firefighter members leaving service without withdrawing accumulated contributions and who have a minimum of four (4) years of service may receive a retirement benefit amount in accordance with W.S.

9-3-431

.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 9-309; Laws 1959, ch. 86, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

9-3-415

, 9-5-215; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 1994, ch. 67, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 82, § 2; 2012, ch. 108, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “(b) or (k)” for “or (b),” added the present last sentence, and made a stylistic change.

§ 9-3-417.
Determination of eligibility for retirement; board to determine equivalent of years of service; credit for military service.

The board shall determine the total years of service creditable to each member for the purpose of determining eligibility for retirement under this article including law enforcement officers for retirement under W.S.

9-3-432

. It may require members to file detailed statements of all service as a covered member and to give other necessary information as a condition to the receipt of benefits under this article.

The board shall determine and adopt appropriate rules and regulations defining how much service in any year is the equivalent of one (1) year of service, but in no case shall it allow credit for more than one (1) year of service for all service rendered within one (1) calendar year. In addition, part-time employment shall be credited as follows, with eighty-six (86) or more hours per month considered full-time employment:

Forty (40) or more but less than eighty-six (86) hours per month — one half (1/2) month credit;

less than forty (40) hours per month — one quarter (1/4) month credit.

Credit shall be allowed for any period of time after commencement of participation in the retirement program which a member spends in active military or other emergency service of the United States in accordance with rules adopted by the board pursuant to the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act, 38 U.S.C. 4301 et seq. In accordance with rule and regulation of the board, until June 30, 2018 up to two (2) years of credit allowed under this subsection may be provided at no cost to the member. After June 30, 2010, each state agency, department or institution, including the University of Wyoming and the community colleges shall estimate the amount required for provision of credits under this subsection for the next biennium and shall include the estimate in the agency’s biennial budget request. Provision for payment of employer’s contributions under this subsection shall be as provided in W.S.

9-3-414

.

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 67, § 3.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 9-310; W.S. 1977, §§

9-3-416

. 9-5-216; Laws 1978, ch. 11, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 1994, ch. 67, §§ 2, 3; 2000, ch. 48, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 82, § 2; 2003, ch. 103, § 1; 2009, ch. 178, § 1; 2010, ch. 58, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

in (c), in the first sentence, inserted “active” preceding “military or other emergency service”, in the second sentence, deleted “Subject to amounts made available by legislative appropriation and” from the beginning and inserted “until June 30, 2018” preceding “up to two (2) years”, and added the last two sentences.

Laws 2009, ch. 178, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2009.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (c), inserted “after commencement of participation in the retirement program,” and substituted “Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act, 38 U.S.C. 4301 et seq” for “Veterans' Reemployment Rights Act (38 U.S.C. 4321, et seq. P.L. 93 508).”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2007, ch. 65, § 1, states as follows: “One hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000.00), or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the Wyoming retirement board for fiscal years 2007 and 2008 to fund military service retirement credits for retirement system members pursuant to W.S. 9-3-417(c).”

Laws 2009, ch. 178, § 2, provides: “Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00), or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the Wyoming retirement board for fiscal years 2009 and 2010 to fund military service retirement credits for retirement system members pursuant to W.S. 9-3-417(c).”

§ 9-3-418.
Amount of service retirement benefit; firefighter members excluded.

The normal retirement benefit for a member who first becomes covered under this article after June 30, 1981 and before September 1, 2012 is equal to two and one-eighth percent (2 1/8%) of the highest average salary multiplied by his years of service credit for the first fifteen (15) years of service credit, and two and one-fourth percent (2 1/4%) of the highest average salary multiplied by his years of service credit for any years of service credit exceeding fifteen (15) years.

The retirement benefit for a member with service after March 31, 1953 but prior to July 1, 1981 is equal to the following:

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 67, § 3.

A monthly benefit amount based on the actuarial equivalent of double the member’s account with any applicable increase under W.S.

9-3-419

; or

Two and one-eighth percent (2 1/8%) of the member’s highest average salary multiplied by his years of service credit for the first fifteen (15) years of service credit, and two and one-fourth percent (2 1/4%) of the member’s highest average salary multiplied by his years of service credit for any years of service credit exceeding fifteen (15) years.

and (d) Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 67, § 3.

This section does not apply to any firefighter member covered and vested under W.S.

9-3-431

or any law enforcement member covered and vested under W.S.

9-3-432

.

Benefits shall not be payable under the system to the extent that they exceed the limitations imposed by section 415(b) of the United States Internal Revenue Code. The board shall provide any benefits in excess of the limitations under special pay plans authorized under W.S. 9-3-405(b) to the extent the benefits can be provided and the system retain qualified plan status under the Internal Revenue Code.

The normal retirement benefit for a member initially employed after August 31, 2012 is equal to two percent (2%) of the highest average salary multiplied by his years of service credit.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 13; 1957, ch. 85, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-311; Laws 1961, ch. 78, § 1; 1967, ch. 147, § 1; 1971, ch. 38, §§ 1 to 3; ch. 263, §§ 4, 5; 1973, ch. 158, §§ 2, 4; 1975, ch. 105, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

9-3-417

, 9-5-217; Laws 1978, ch. 50, § 1; 1979, ch. 54, § 1; 1981, ch. 36, § 1; ch. 38, § 1; ch. 40, § 1; 1982, ch. 40, § 1; ch. 62, § 3; 1984, ch. 39, § 1; 1985, ch. 164, § 1; 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 1990, ch. 31, § 1; 1994, ch. 67, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 31, § 1; ch. 65, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 82, § 2; 2010, ch. 58, § 1; 2012, ch. 108, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (f).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added “and before September 1, 2012” in (a); and added (g).

Early retirement discount factor. —

Laws 1990, ch. 31, § 2, provides: “The retirement board shall amend the early retirement discount factor to a five percent (5%) discount for each year of retirement taken before age sixty (60).”

Severance pay not included in calculations. —

Based on the plain and ordinary meanings of “severance pay” and “remuneration,” severance pay is not “remuneration” and, therefore, not “salary” and should not be included when calculating retirement benefits under this section. “Severance pay” is primarily gratuitous and, although it may be intended to partially alleviate the loss of employment, it is not an attempt to equally compensate the employee for services rendered, losses suffered, or expenses incurred. Mowry v. State ex rel. Wyoming Retirement Bd., 866 P.2d 729,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 195

(Wyo. 1993).

§ 9-3-419.
Retirement benefit adjustments.

The retirement benefit specified under W.S. 9-3-418(b)(ii) is subject to the following cumulative increases:

The benefit for covered service prior to July 1, 1975 is increased by twenty-five percent (25%) with a maximum increase of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per month;

The benefit of a member, survivor or beneficiary is increased by forty percent (40%);

The benefit of a member for service prior to July 1, 1975 is increased by twenty percent (20%).

through (vii) Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 67, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 107, § 3.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 1988, ch. 21, § 1; 1989, ch. 237, § 1; 1990, ch. 74, § 1; 1991, ch. 12, § 1; ch. 29, § 3; 1994, ch. 67, §§ 2, 3; 1997, ch. 31, § 2; ch. 52, § 1; 1998, ch. 72, § 1; 1999, ch. 76, § 1; 2001, ch. 31, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 82, § 2; 2004, ch. 55, § 1; 2012, ch. 107, § 3.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, rewrote (b)(ii) and (iii), modifying benefit adjustments for cost-of-living increases.

The 2012 amendment,

repealed (b), which read: “Effective July 1, 2001 and on each July 1 thereafter, and except as provided for law enforcement officers under W.S.

9-3-432

, any retirement benefit, survivor benefit or disability benefit received by eligible individuals under this article shall be adjusted as follows: (i) Before each July 1, the board shall determine the percentage increase in the cost of living for the preceding calendar year. The percentage increase in the cost of living for a calendar year is equal to the annual percentage increase in the cost of living as of the immediately following January 1 as shown by the Wyoming cost-of-living index as determined by the division of economic analysis of the department of administration and information; (ii) Subject to the limitation imposed under paragraph (vi) of this subsection, the benefits existing on each July 1 for each eligible individual may be increased by an amount not to exceed the greater of the percentage increase in the cost of living as determined by the board under paragraph (i) of this subsection or a percentage adjustment to a level the system's actuary determines to be actuarially sound pursuant to paragraph (v) of this subsection; (iii) The amount of any percentage increase in the cost of living which exceeds the percentage adjustment under paragraph (ii) of this subsection shall to the extent determined actuarially sound by the system's actuary, be accumulated and added to future years' percentage increases in the cost of living; (iv) Individuals who have been receiving applicable benefits for at least two (2) years, either alone or in combination with a member, if the individual is a survivor, are eligible for the benefits under this subsection; (v) An increase in benefits under this subsection is effective only upon a determination by the system's actuary that the increase is actuarially sound. The actuary shall annually report its determination pursuant to this paragraph to the governor and the joint appropriations interim committee; and (vi) The total benefit adjustment under this subsection shall not exceed three percent (3%) in any one (1) year.”

Laws 2012, ch. 107, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2012.

§ 9-3-420.
Option as to form of benefit; beneficiary designations.

Subject to uniform rules and regulations the board prescribes, a member may instead of the service retirement benefits provided in this article, elect one (1) of the following forms of retirement benefits which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which he would otherwise be entitled:

A one hundred percent (100%) joint and survivor benefit which provides reduced monthly service retirement benefit payments during the retired member’s life and upon his death after retirement continues payments in the same reduced amount to a designated beneficiary during the life of the beneficiary;

A fifty percent (50%) joint and survivor benefit which provides reduced monthly service retirement benefit payments during the retired member’s life and upon his death after retirement continues payments, in the amount of fifty percent (50%) of the reduced amount, to the designated beneficiary during the life of the beneficiary;

A benefit which provides reduced monthly service retirement payments with provision for the continuance of payments for ten (10) years certain and life thereafter. If the retired member dies within ten (10) years after retirement, the remaining guaranteed payments shall be made to his designated beneficiary. This beneficiary may be changed at any time by written notification to the board as provided in subsection (b) of this section;

The largest possible benefit for life with no lump sum refund or benefit for anyone else upon the retired member’s death;

Any other modified monthly service retirement benefit, including any other modified joint and survivor monthly service retirement benefit, actuarially determined, which the board approves.

An election of an optional benefit shall be in writing and filed with the system prior to the first benefit payment. The election is final and not subject to change unless a designated beneficiary dies prior to the first benefit payment, in which case the election is void, the member may designate a new beneficiary and may select a different option.

The retirement benefits payable under optional forms available under this section shall be the actuarial equivalent amount of the normal benefit form under W.S.

9-3-415

and, if applicable,

9-3-431

and

9-3-432

.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 1994, ch. 67, § 2; 2001, ch. 65, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 82, § 2.

§ 9-3-421.
Death benefits; monthly benefit option; refund of excess employee contributions plus interest; medical insurance premiums.

If a member dies before retirement under the system, except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, the member’s account plus an additional amount equal to the member’s account shall be paid to the member’s designated beneficiaries, or in the absence of designated beneficiaries to his estate. If the member is vested, instead of a lump sum payment, a beneficiary may elect to receive the actuarial equivalent of the lump sum of any benefit for life which is available to a retired member as provided in this article. A beneficiary, who is the surviving spouse of the deceased member and who elects to receive the actuarial equivalent of the lump sum, as a life benefit may, within eighteen (18) months of the death of the member, elect to receive the lump sum death benefit otherwise provided in this subsection plus interest accumulated on that amount less any payments received by the surviving spouse.

Unless otherwise provided by the benefit option selected by a member pursuant to W.S.

9-3-420

, if any member receiving benefits or his beneficiary receiving retirement benefits under this article dies before the total amount of benefits paid to either the member or his beneficiary or both equals the amount of the member’s account at retirement, then the excess, if any, shall be paid to any other named beneficiary, if any, or to the member’s estate.

A designated beneficiary of a member, by signed affidavit, may request that medical insurance premiums be paid from the member’s account balance for a period not to exceed four (4) months after the death of the member or until a benefit option has been elected.

For purposes of determining a member’s account under subsections (a) through (c) of this section, if a member dies before the member has vested under the system, the member’s account shall consist of the contributions and interest that accrue in the manner for which contributions and interest accrue for a member who is vested.

If a member initially employed on or after July 1, 2019 who is not vested and is not a current employee at the time of death, which occurs before retirement under the system, only the member’s account shall be paid to the member’s designated beneficiaries, or in the absence of designated beneficiaries to the member’s estate.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 1994, ch. 67, § 2; 1995, ch. 162, § 1; 2018 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (d).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), added "except as provided in subsection (e) of this section," following "under the system," in the first sentence; in (b), substituted "account under subsection (a) through (c) of this section" for "account under this section"; and added (e).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (d) substituted “subsections (a) through (c)” for “subsection (a) through (c).”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2018, ch. 31, § 2, provides: "This act shall apply to the distribution of benefits subject to this act made on and after the effective date of this act.

"Nothing in this act shall be construed to modify or impair existing contracts or other obligations executed prior to the effective date of this act."

Laws 2019, ch. 51, § 2, provides: "This act shall apply to the distribution of benefits subject to this act made on and after the effective date of this act.""Nothing in this act shall be construed to modify or impair existing contracts or other obligations executed prior to the effective date of this act."

Applicability. —

Laws 1995, ch. 162, § 2, provides: “Before October 31, 1995, any surviving spouse of a deceased member which surviving spouse would have been eligible to elect a lump sum benefit under section 1 of this act had it been in effect on the date of the deceased member's death may elect to receive the lump sum death benefit specified in W.S. 9-3-421(a) plus interest accumulated on that amount less any payments received by the surviving spouse.”

§ 9-3-422.
Disability retirement; board determination; reports and examinations; amount; options as to form of benefit.

Except as specified for law enforcement officers under W.S.

9-3-432

, any member in service who has ten (10) or more years of service credit during which contributions have been paid because of illness or injury outside of or in the scope of employment, or any firefighter member in service for whom contributions have been paid because of injury in the scope of employment, may retire on account of a total or partial disability in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board. In determining mental or physical incapacitation for disability retirement under this section, the board may require physician reports, medical examinations, functional capacity evaluations, vocational examinations and other necessary reports and examinations for purposes of this section. The costs of any functional capacity evaluation, vocational examination or other specialized test required under this subsection shall be paid from the retirement account.

Upon retirement for a total disability and except as provided under W.S. 9-3-431(f) and 9-3-432(h), a member shall receive a monthly disability retirement benefit for the period of his disability equal to one hundred percent (100%) of his service retirement benefit under this article as if the member was eligible for normal retirement benefits. Upon retirement for a partial disability, a member shall receive a monthly disability retirement benefit for the period of his disability equal to fifty percent (50%) of the normal retirement benefit payable to the member as if the member were eligible for normal retirement benefits. Disability benefits are payable for the life of the member or until the member is no longer disabled.

Any employee granted disability retirement under this section shall at the time retirement is granted, elect to receive either the benefit authorized by this section or one (1) of the joint and survivor benefit options specified in W.S.

9-3-420

.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 9-313; Laws 1973, ch. 158, §§ 2, 4; W.S. 1977, §§

9-3-419

, 9-5-219; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1983, ch. 94, § 1; 1985, ch. 31, § 1; 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 1989, ch. 167, § 1; 1991, ch. 209, § 1; 1994, ch. 67, § 2; 1995, ch. 90, § 1; 2001, ch. 65, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 82, § 2.

§ 9-3-423.
Disability; medical and other examinations, tests and evaluations subsequent to retirement; failure to submit to examinations, tests and evaluations; restoration to service; deduction from benefit for excess earnings.

Once each year during the first five (5) years following retirement of a member for disability under the system, and once in every three (3) year period thereafter, the board may require a member who is not eligible for normal retirement benefits pursuant to W.S. 9-3-415(a) or

9-3-431

to undergo a medical examination by a physician designated by the board or any other examination, test or evaluation determined necessary by the board. If the member refuses to submit to a medical or other examination, test or evaluation, his benefit payments shall be discontinued.

If any member receiving a disability benefit under this article is restored to service, the payment of the benefit shall be discontinued, that member shall become a contributing member of the system and all previous years of service credit including the period of the disability retirement, shall be credited to his service for the purpose of determining eligibility under W.S.

9-3-415

or

9-3-431

.

If a member is restored to service from disability retirement and subsequently discontinues his employment for any reason other than a recurrence of the original disability, or another disability, he is not entitled to any disability benefit.

Any member receiving a nonduty-connected total or partial disability benefit who has not reached age sixty (60) shall annually report to the board in a form prescribed by the board, his total earnings for the preceding calendar year from any gainful employment for wages and any worker’s compensation benefits. Fifty percent (50%) of the excess of any earnings or benefits over the base pay for the position held at the time of disability shall be deducted, in a manner the board determines, from his disability benefit beginning ninety (90) days following the day the report is due. If any member received a disability benefit for less than twelve (12) months in a calendar year for which earnings were reported, the deduction, if any, shall be determined on a pro rata basis.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 9-314; Laws 1973, ch. 158, § 2; W.S. 1977, §§

9-3-420

, 9-5-220; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1983, ch. 94, § 1; 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 1994, ch. 67, § 2; 1995, ch. 90, § 1; 2001, ch. 65, § 2; 2005, ch. 152, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

in (d), inserted “nonduty-connected” in the first sentence.

Laws 2005, ch. 152, § 1, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2005.